dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 Y 262
SFX c3 er er/25 er 21
SFX c3 er ant/25 [^cg]er 22
SFX c3 écer éçant/25 écer 22
SFX c3 éger égeant/25 éger 22
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/26 ébrer 27
SFX c3 écer èce/26 écer 27
SFX c3 écher èche/26 écher 27
SFX c3 écrer ècre/26 écrer 27
SFX c3 éder ède/26 éder 27
SFX c3 éger ège/26 éger 27
SFX c3 égler ègle/26 égler 27
SFX c3 égner ègne/26 égner 27
SFX c3 égrer ègre/26 égrer 27
SFX c3 éguer ègue/26 éguer 27
SFX c3 éler èle/26 éler 27
SFX c3 émer ème/26 émer 27
SFX c3 éner ène/26 éner 27
SFX c3 éper èpe/26 éper 27
SFX c3 équer èque/26 équer 27
SFX c3 érer ère/26 érer 27
SFX c3 éser èse/26 éser 27
SFX c3 éter ète/26 éter 27
SFX c3 étrer ètre/26 étrer 27
SFX c3 évrer èvre/26 évrer 27
SFX c3 éyer èye/26 éyer 27
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/27 ébrer 28
SFX c3 écer èces/27 écer 28
SFX c3 écher èches/27 écher 28
SFX c3 écrer ècres/27 écrer 28
SFX c3 éder èdes/27 éder 28
SFX c3 éger èges/27 éger 28
SFX c3 égler ègles/27 égler 28
SFX c3 égner ègnes/27 égner 28
SFX c3 égrer ègres/27 égrer 28
SFX c3 éguer ègues/27 éguer 28
SFX c3 éler èles/27 éler 28
SFX c3 émer èmes/27 émer 28
SFX c3 éner ènes/27 éner 28
SFX c3 éper èpes/27 éper 28
SFX c3 équer èques/27 équer 28
SFX c3 érer ères/27 érer 28
SFX c3 éser èses/27 éser 28
SFX c3 éter ètes/27 éter 28
SFX c3 étrer ètres/27 étrer 28
SFX c3 évrer èvres/27 évrer 28
SFX c3 éyer èyes/27 éyer 28
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/28 ébrer 29
SFX c3 écer èce/28 écer 29
SFX c3 écher èche/28 écher 29
SFX c3 écrer ècre/28 écrer 29
SFX c3 éder ède/28 éder 29
SFX c3 éger ège/28 éger 29
SFX c3 égler ègle/28 égler 29
SFX c3 égner ègne/28 égner 29
SFX c3 égrer ègre/28 égrer 29
SFX c3 éguer ègue/28 éguer 29
SFX c3 éler èle/28 éler 29
SFX c3 émer ème/28 émer 29
SFX c3 éner ène/28 éner 29
SFX c3 éper èpe/28 éper 29
SFX c3 équer èque/28 équer 29
SFX c3 érer ère/28 érer 29
SFX c3 éser èse/28 éser 29
SFX c3 éter ète/28 éter 29
SFX c3 étrer ètre/28 étrer 29
SFX c3 évrer èvre/28 évrer 29
SFX c3 éyer èye/28 éyer 29
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er 30
SFX c3 écer éçons écer 30
SFX c3 éger égeons éger 30
SFX c3 er ez er 31
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/28 ébrer 32
SFX c3 écer ècent/28 écer 32
SFX c3 écher èchent/28 écher 32
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/28 écrer 32
SFX c3 éder èdent/28 éder 32
SFX c3 éger ègent/28 éger 32
SFX c3 égler èglent/28 égler 32
SFX c3 égner ègnent/28 égner 32
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/28 égrer 32
SFX c3 éguer èguent/28 éguer 32
SFX c3 éler èlent/28 éler 32
SFX c3 émer èment/28 émer 32
SFX c3 éner ènent/28 éner 32
SFX c3 éper èpent/28 éper 32
SFX c3 équer èquent/28 équer 32
SFX c3 érer èrent/28 érer 32
SFX c3 éser èsent/28 éser 32
SFX c3 éter ètent/28 éter 32
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/28 étrer 32
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/28 évrer 32
SFX c3 éyer èyent/28 éyer 32
SFX c3 er ais/26 [^cg]er 33
SFX c3 écer éçais/26 écer 33
SFX c3 éger égeais/26 éger 33
SFX c3 er ais/27 [^cg]er 34
SFX c3 écer éçais/27 écer 34
SFX c3 éger égeais/27 éger 34
SFX c3 er ait/28 [^cg]er 35
SFX c3 écer éçait/28 écer 35
SFX c3 éger égeait/28 éger 35
SFX c3 er ions er 36
SFX c3 er iez er 37
SFX c3 er aient/28 [^cg]er 38
SFX c3 écer éçaient/28 écer 38
SFX c3 éger égeaient/28 éger 38
SFX c3 er ai/26 [^cg]er 39
SFX c3 écer éçai/26 écer 39
SFX c3 éger égeai/26 éger 39
SFX c3 er as/27 [^cg]er 40
SFX c3 écer éças/27 écer 40
SFX c3 éger égeas/27 éger 40
SFX c3 er a/28 [^cg]er 41
SFX c3 écer éça/28 écer 41
SFX c3 éger égea/28 éger 41
SFX c3 er âmes [^cg]er 42
SFX c3 écer éçâmes écer 42
SFX c3 éger égeâmes éger 42
SFX c3 er âtes [^cg]er 43
SFX c3 écer éçâtes écer 43
SFX c3 éger égeâtes éger 43
SFX c3 er èrent/28 er 44
SFX c3 er erai/26 er 45
SFX c3 er eras/27 er 46
SFX c3 er era/28 er 47
SFX c3 er erons er 48
SFX c3 er erez er 49
SFX c3 er eront/28 er 50
SFX c3 er erais/26 er 51
SFX c3 er erais/27 er 52
SFX c3 er erait/28 er 53
SFX c3 er erions er 54
SFX c3 er eriez er 55
SFX c3 er eraient/28 er 56
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/26 ébrer 57
SFX c3 écer èce/26 écer 57
SFX c3 écher èche/26 écher 57
SFX c3 écrer ècre/26 écrer 57
SFX c3 éder ède/26 éder 57
SFX c3 éger ège/26 éger 57
SFX c3 égler ègle/26 égler 57
SFX c3 égner ègne/26 égner 57
SFX c3 égrer ègre/26 égrer 57
SFX c3 éguer ègue/26 éguer 57
SFX c3 éler èle/26 éler 57
SFX c3 émer ème/26 émer 57
SFX c3 éner ène/26 éner 57
SFX c3 éper èpe/26 éper 57
SFX c3 équer èque/26 équer 57
SFX c3 érer ère/26 érer 57
SFX c3 éser èse/26 éser 57
SFX c3 éter ète/26 éter 57
SFX c3 étrer ètre/26 étrer 57
SFX c3 évrer èvre/26 évrer 57
SFX c3 éyer èye/26 éyer 57
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/27 ébrer 58
SFX c3 écer èces/27 écer 58
SFX c3 écher èches/27 écher 58
SFX c3 écrer ècres/27 écrer 58
SFX c3 éder èdes/27 éder 58
SFX c3 éger èges/27 éger 58
SFX c3 égler ègles/27 égler 58
SFX c3 égner ègnes/27 égner 58
SFX c3 égrer ègres/27 égrer 58
SFX c3 éguer ègues/27 éguer 58
SFX c3 éler èles/27 éler 58
SFX c3 émer èmes/27 émer 58
SFX c3 éner ènes/27 éner 58
SFX c3 éper èpes/27 éper 58
SFX c3 équer èques/27 équer 58
SFX c3 érer ères/27 érer 58
SFX c3 éser èses/27 éser 58
SFX c3 éter ètes/27 éter 58
SFX c3 étrer ètres/27 étrer 58
SFX c3 évrer èvres/27 évrer 58
SFX c3 éyer èyes/27 éyer 58
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/28 ébrer 59
SFX c3 écer èce/28 écer 59
SFX c3 écher èche/28 écher 59
SFX c3 écrer ècre/28 écrer 59
SFX c3 éder ède/28 éder 59
SFX c3 éger ège/28 éger 59
SFX c3 égler ègle/28 égler 59
SFX c3 égner ègne/28 égner 59
SFX c3 égrer ègre/28 égrer 59
SFX c3 éguer ègue/28 éguer 59
SFX c3 éler èle/28 éler 59
SFX c3 émer ème/28 émer 59
SFX c3 éner ène/28 éner 59
SFX c3 éper èpe/28 éper 59
SFX c3 équer èque/28 équer 59
SFX c3 érer ère/28 érer 59
SFX c3 éser èse/28 éser 59
SFX c3 éter ète/28 éter 59
SFX c3 étrer ètre/28 étrer 59
SFX c3 évrer èvre/28 évrer 59
SFX c3 éyer èye/28 éyer 59
SFX c3 er ions er 60
SFX c3 er iez er 61
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/28 ébrer 62
SFX c3 écer ècent/28 écer 62
SFX c3 écher èchent/28 écher 62
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/28 écrer 62
SFX c3 éder èdent/28 éder 62
SFX c3 éger ègent/28 éger 62
SFX c3 égler èglent/28 égler 62
SFX c3 égner ègnent/28 égner 62
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/28 égrer 62
SFX c3 éguer èguent/28 éguer 62
SFX c3 éler èlent/28 éler 62
SFX c3 émer èment/28 émer 62
SFX c3 éner ènent/28 éner 62
SFX c3 éper èpent/28 éper 62
SFX c3 équer èquent/28 équer 62
SFX c3 érer èrent/28 érer 62
SFX c3 éser èsent/28 éser 62
SFX c3 éter ètent/28 éter 62
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/28 étrer 62
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/28 évrer 62
SFX c3 éyer èyent/28 éyer 62
SFX c3 er asse/26 [^cg]er 63
SFX c3 écer éçasse/26 écer 63
SFX c3 éger égeasse/26 éger 63
SFX c3 er asses/27 [^cg]er 64
SFX c3 écer éçasses/27 écer 64
SFX c3 éger égeasses/27 éger 64
SFX c3 er ât/28 [^cg]er 65
SFX c3 écer éçât/28 écer 65
SFX c3 éger égeât/28 éger 65
SFX c3 er assions [^cg]er 66
SFX c3 écer éçassions écer 66
SFX c3 éger égeassions éger 66
SFX c3 er assiez [^cg]er 67
SFX c3 écer éçassiez écer 67
SFX c3 éger égeassiez éger 67
SFX c3 er assent/28 [^cg]er 68
SFX c3 écer éçassent/28 écer 68
SFX c3 éger égeassent/28 éger 68
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/27 ébrer 69
SFX c3 écer èce/27 écer 69
SFX c3 écher èche/27 écher 69
SFX c3 écrer ècre/27 écrer 69
SFX c3 éder ède/27 éder 69
SFX c3 égler ègle/27 égler 69
SFX c3 égner ègne/27 égner 69
SFX c3 égrer ègre/27 égrer 69
SFX c3 éguer ègue/27 éguer 69
SFX c3 éler èle/27 éler 69
SFX c3 émer ème/27 émer 69
SFX c3 éner ène/27 éner 69
SFX c3 éper èpe/27 éper 69
SFX c3 équer èque/27 équer 69
SFX c3 érer ère/27 érer 69
SFX c3 éser èse/27 éser 69
SFX c3 éter ète/27 éter 69
SFX c3 étrer ètre/27 étrer 69
SFX c3 évrer èvre/27 évrer 69
SFX c3 éyer èye/27 éyer 69
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er 70
SFX c3 écer éçons écer 70
SFX c3 éger égeons éger 70
SFX c3 er ez er 71
